Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 8 Health Service Provider Psychologists

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1426, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that treatment of psychological problems of persons residing within the community would in some cases be advanced by temporary hospitalization. The interests of the people of this state demand that all appropriate resources, including inpatient facilities, be available to assist in the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, and amelioration of psychological problems and emotional and mental disorders. The General Assembly recognizes that psychology is an independent health profession as set forth and prescribed by the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists and Chapter 39 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. It is therefore the intent of the General Assembly, in enacting this Act, to authorize medical facilities and institutions, on local determination, to make psychological services available in an inpatient setting.”

31-7-160.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Health service provider psychologist” means a licensed psychologist who meets the criteria of training and experience as provided in Code Section 31-7-162 in the delivery of direct, preventive, assessment and therapeutic intervention services to individuals whose growth, adjustment, or functioning is actually impaired or is demonstrably at a high risk of impairment.

“Psychologist’s order” means an order issued by a health service provider psychologist practicing psychology in accordance with Chapter 39 of Title 43 for the care and treatment rendered to a person in a medical facility or institution, including admission and discharge. Such care and treatment does not include the ordering or prescribing of medications, nursing assessments or interventions, or medical procedures.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1426, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 911, § 2.

31-7-161.
Appointment to staff of medical facility or institution.

A medical facility or institution may provide for the appointment of health service provider psychologists on such terms and conditions as the medical facility or institution shall establish. Psychologists shall be eligible to hold membership and serve on committees of the medical or professional staff and may possess clinical privileges and carry professional responsibilities consistent with the scope of their licensure and their competence, subject to the reasonable rules of the medical facility or institution. Such privileges and responsibilities may include issuing a psychologist’s order. A physician shall be designated to be responsible for the medical aspects of care for a patient admitted by a psychologist.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

A health service provider psychologist is authorized to issue a psychologist’s order to a registered professional nurse or a licensed practical nurse; and

A registered professional nurse and a licensed practical nurse shall have the authority to execute a psychologist’s order, provided that a registered professional nurse or licensed practical nurse may confer with the health service provider psychologist prior to executing the psychologist’s order. Nothing contained in this article shall be deemed to alter the standard of care of the registered professional nurse or the licensed practical nurse applicable to the evaluation and execution of orders, including a psychologist’s order.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1426, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 911, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “psychologist’s” was substituted for “psychologists’s” in the second sentence of paragraph (b)(2).

31-7-162.
Training and experience requirements.

A health service provider psychologist shall meet the following criteria of training and experience:

The psychologist must be currently licensed by the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists;

The psychologist must be eligible to be listed in the National Register of Health Service Providers of Psychology or have completed not less than two years, with 1,500 hours each year, of supervised experience in health service of which at least one year is post doctoral and one year, which may be the post doctoral year, is in an organized health service training program;

A substantial portion of the supervised experience must be in an inpatient setting; and

Two supportive letters of recommendation from health service providers in psychology who are familiar with the applicant’s work must be submitted to the medical facility or institution.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1426, § 2.

31-7-163.
Status of present psychologist staff members.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit a psychologist currently a member of a hospital staff or an employee of a hospital from continuing to work in that capacity.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1426, § 2.

31-7-164.
Limitation or revocation of staff privileges.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the exercise of privileges in any medical facility or institution may be limited, restricted, or revoked for reasons including, but not limited to, the violation of such medical facility’s or institution’s rules, regulations, or procedures which are applied, in good faith, in a nondiscriminatory manner to all practitioners in such medical facility or institution exercising such privileges or entitled to exercise such privileges.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1426, § 2.

Cross references.

Peer review groups for psychologists, §

31-7-130

et seq.

31-7-165.
Report of denial of staff privileges.

When any health service provider psychologist is denied staff privileges or is removed from the medical or professional staff, such action shall be reported by the facility to the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-165

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1426, § 2.